Vermont, session 2025-2026, S26.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 1264b is added to read:
§ 1264b. ARTIFICIAL DYES
(a) In operating its school lunch and breakfast program, pursuant to the
National School Lunch Act, as amended, and the Child Nutrition Act, as
amended, respectively, or selling competitive food, a school district and an
approved independent school shall not serve a food or beverage during the
school day containing one or more of the following substances:
VT LEG #379047 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.26
2025 Page 2 of 2
(1) Blue 1 (CAS 3844-45-9);
(2) Blue 2 (CAS 860-22-0);
(3) Green 3 (CAS 2353-45-9);
(4) Red 40 (CAS 25956-17-6);
(5) Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0); and
(6) Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0).
(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to those foods or
beverages sold or served away from a school campus or at least one half-hour
after the school day until 12:00 midnight.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) “Competitive food” has the same meaning as in 7 C.F.R. § 210.11.
(2) “School day,” as pertains to public schools, shall be defined by the
school district pursuant to subsection 1071(b) of this title, and as pertains to
approved independent schools, means the hours fixed by a school for
instruction each day.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
VT LEG #379047 v.1